src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv13_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    mørk+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: mørk
    mørk+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: mørk
    mørk+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: mørk
    mørk+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: markar
    mørk+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: merkur
    mørk+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: mørkum
    mørk+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: marka
    mørk+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: mørkin
    mørk+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: mørkina
    mørk+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: mørkini
    mørk+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: markarinnar
    mørk+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: merkurnar
    mørk+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: mørkunum
    mørk+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: markanna
      
